Maine, session 132, LD568.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3212, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 316, §3, is
amended to read:
B. The commission shall establish the maximum duration of a standard-offer service
contract after considering is 6 months. In choosing a standard-offer service provider,
the commission shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, market
risks and the need for price stability and contract flexibility. If at the expiration of a
contract the commission rejects all bids submitted for a new contract, the expiring
contract must continue until the commission accepts a bid for a new contract. If at the
expiration of a contract the standard-offer service provider submits a bid that increases
the rate for electricity that was offered in the expiring contract, the provider must
include justification for the rate increase.